Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1.1:1. Nutrient Trading Act.

§§ 10.1-603.15:1 through 10.1-603.15:5.
Repealed by Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions related to Nutrient Trading program, see §§ 62.1-44.19:21 through 62.1-44.19:23.

Editor’s note.

For complete transition provisions related to transfer of certain water quality programs (stormwater management, erosion and sediment control, nutrient trading, and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas) formerly administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, to the Department of Environmental Quality, see Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cls. 4 through 14, noted in full under Article 2.3 (§ 62.1-44.15:24 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, recodified Article 1.1:1 (§

10.1-603.15:1

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 10.1, as §§ 62.1-44.19:21 through 62.1-44.19:23. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 6 provides: “That upon the Governor’s approval of the provisions of this act, the Department of Environmental Quality shall seek the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to return delegation of program authority to the State Water Control Board for the issuance of the national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges for MS4 and construction activities under the federal Clean Water Act. Permits issued by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board or a Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program authority or a Virginia Stormwater Management Program authority acting under the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board’s authority that have not expired or been revoked or terminated before or on the program transfer date shall continue to remain in full force and effect until their specified expiration dates.”